Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-2120
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-2120 to 44-2155 shall be known and may be cited as the Insurance Holding Company System Act.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB772, § 10.